Louisiana, session 2026, HB1068.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4169.1(A)(1)(b) through (e) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§4169.1. Municipal and parish authority over collection and disposal of garbage and
trash; franchising, permitting, and licensing; assessment and collection of
service charge
A.(1) The governing authority of every parish or municipality shall have the
following powers:
* * *
(b) To grant permits, licenses, exclusive or nonexclusive franchises,
exclusive contracts, or any combination thereof to garbage and trash collectors and
disposers. A governing authority of a parish or municipality is authorized, but not
required, to issue a request for proposals prior to granting an exclusive contract. Any
exclusive franchise shall be granted only after advertising for bids, reception of bids,
and awarding of the contract or contracts in accordance with the public bid laws of
the state and other provisions of law.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1068 ENROLLED
(c) To grant exclusive contracts to garbage and trash collectors and
disposers. Any exclusive contract shall be granted only after issuing a request for
proposals, or advertising for bids and receiving bids, and awarding of the contract
in accordance with the public bid laws of the state and other provisions of law.
(d) (c) To enter into time contracts for the collection and transportation of
garbage or trash for a term of up to ten years, with an option to extend for an
additional five-year term, and for disposal of garbage or trash for a term of up to
twenty-five years, with an option to extend for an additional five-year term.
(e) (d) To assess a service charge against any person provided any service
pursuant to Subparagraph (a) or (b) of this Paragraph. However, in the parishes of
Lafourche, Vermilion, Rapides, and Washington, such charge shall be imposed only
after the question of its imposition has been submitted to the qualified electors of the
parish at an election to be conducted in accordance with the general election laws of
the state, and a majority of those voting in the election shall have voted in favor of
the imposition of the charge.
(f) (e) To otherwise regulate the collection and disposal of garbage and trash.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 33:4169.1(A)(1)(f) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.